src/morphology/incoming/kawe-all.lexc
! ========================================================================== !
!             !!!Mohawk morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !
!! INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Mohawk LANGUAGE.
 


!! first attempt to model simplest form of mohawk verbs:
!! personal prefix + root
!! http://giellatekno.uit.no/doc/lang/common/MorphologicalTags.html
!! extra tages are listed below

Multichar_Symbols  !!≈ !!!@CODE@ definitions
Verb+
AgentSg1+ !! I-> X
AgentSg2+  !! you-> X
AgentSg3Mal+ !! he -> X
AgentSg3Fem+ !! she/smb/they -> X
AgentSg3Neuter+ !! it -> X
AgentDu21+ !! you and I -> X
AgentDu31+ !! smb and I -> X
AgentDu2+ !! you two -> X
AgentDu3+ !! two males or mixed -> X
AgentDu3Fem+ !! two females -> X
AgentPl2Sg1+ !! you all and I -> X
AgentPl3Sg1+ !! they all and I -> X
AgentPl2+ !! you all
AgentPl3+ !! they all (male or mixed) -> X
AgentPl3Fem+ !! they all (female) -> X
PatSg1+ !! X -> I
PatSg2+  !!  X -> you
PatSg3Mal+ !! X -> he 
PatSg3Fem+ !! X -> she/smb/they 
PatSg3Neuter+ !! X -> it 
PatDu21+ !! X -> you and I
PatDu31+ !! X -> smb and I 
PatDu2+ !! X -> you two 
PatDu3+ !! X -> two males or mixed 
PatDu3Fem+ !! X -> two females
PatPl2Sg1+ !! X -> you all and I 
PatPl3Sg1+ !! X -> they all and I 
PatPl2+ !! X -> you all
PatPl3+ !! X -> they all (male or mixed) 
PatPl3Fem+ !! X -> they all (female) 
Mal+  !!Male
Fem+ !!Female
Neuter+ !!Neuter
Active+ !! Active voice, Red verbs
Passive+ !! Passive voice, Blue verbs
Transitive+ !! Transitive verbs, Purple verbs
Fut+
DefPast+
Cond+
+Habitual
+Perf
+Punct
+Command
@U.VerbType.Red@
@U.VerbType.Blue@
@U.VerbType.Purple@
@P.CC.One@ @R.CC.One@!! The following are verb conjugation classes, one through 9, plus Exceptions class
@P.CC.Two@ @R.CC.Two@
@P.CC.Three@ @R.CC.Three@
@P.CC.Four@ @R.CC.Four@
@P.CC.Five@ @R.CC.Five@
@P.CC.Six@ @R.CC.Six@
@P.CC.Seven@ @R.CC.Seven@
@P.CC.Eight@ @R.CC.Eight@
@P.CC.Nine@ @R.CC.Nine@
@P.CC.Except@ @R.CC.Except@
@U.Aspect.Command@
@U.Aspect.Habitual@
@U.Aspect.Punct@
@U.Aspect.Perf@



Definitions
    ppStart = %^PP%-%^; !! start of personal prefix boundary  
    rootStart = %^R%-%^; !!  start of the root morpheme  
    habSuf = %^H%^; !! marks verbs the start of Habitual suffix
    perfSuf = %^R%^; !! marks verbs the start of Perfective suffix
    punctSuf = %^P%^; !! marks verbs the start of Habitual suffix
    commandSuf = %^P%^; !! marks verbs the start of Command suffix (usually none)
    futPref = %^Fut%^; !! marks verbs the start of Future prefix
    condPref = %^Cond%^; !! marks verbs the start of Conditional prefix
    pastPref = %^Past%^; !! marks verbs the start of Past prefix


LEXICON Root
!! The word forms in UNDEFINED language start from the lexeme roots of basic
!! word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
! 0   Nouns       ;
Verb+:0   Verbs   ;
! 0   Adjectives  ;
! 0   Pronouns    ;
! 0   Numerals    ;
! 0   Prefixes    ;!! Entry to the lexicons responsible for forming Mohawk verbs

LEXICON Verbs
VerbPrefixes    ;
PronomPrefix    ;!! Verbal prefixes

LEXICON VerbPrefixes

TemporalPrefix  ;

LEXICON TemporalPrefix

FuturePrefix    ;
PastPrefix      ;
CondPrefix  ;

LEXICON FuturePrefix 
<0:futPref "@U.Aspect.Punct@">   Future;

LEXICON Future
Fut+:en PronomPrefix;


LEXICON CondPrefix
<0:condPref "@U.Aspect.Punct@">   Conditional;

LEXICON Conditional
Cond+:ae    PronomPrefix;


LEXICON PastPrefix
<0:pastPref "@U.Aspect.Punct@">   DefinitePast;

LEXICON DefinitePast
DefPast+:wa%'    PronomPrefix;!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------

LEXICON Verbs
VerbPrefixes ;
PronomPrefix ;


LEXICON PronomPrefix
Active+:0   RedPrefixes   ; !! red prefixes f
Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+:0 BluePrefixes  ; !! blue prefixes
Transitive+:0    PurplePrefixes   ; !! purple prefixes

LEXICON RedPrefixes
@U.VerbType.Red@    ActivePronoun;

LEXICON BluePrefixes
@U.VerbType.Blue@    PassivePronoun;

LEXICON PurplePrefixes
@U.VerbType.Purple@    TransitivePronoun;

LEXICON ActivePronoun
<0:ppStart> BoundPronounActive ;

LEXICON PassivePronoun
<0:ppStart> BoundPronounPassive ;

LEXICON TransitivePronoun
<0:ppStart> BoundPronounRelation ;


!!------------------ ACTIVE VERBS (RED PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounActive
AgentSg1+:ke EndActive   ;
AgentSg2+:se EndActive   ;
AgentSg3Mal+:ra EndActive   ;
AgentSg3Fem+:ye EndActive   ;
AgentSg3Neuter+:ka EndActive   ;
AgentDu21+:teni EndActive   ;
AgentDu31+:yakeni EndActive   ;
AgentDu2+:seni EndActive   ;
AgentDu3+:hni EndActive    ;
AgentDu3Fem+:keni EndActive   ;
AgentPl2Sg1+:tewa EndActive   ;
AgentPl3Sg1+:yakwa EndActive   ;
AgentPl2+:sewa EndActive   ;
AgentPl3+:rati EndActive   ;
AgentPl3Fem+:konti EndActive   ;

LEXICON EndActive
PatSg3Neuter+:0 VerbStem   ; !! put a neutral patient for all active verbs

!!------------------ PASSIVE VERBS (BLUE PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounPassive
PatSg1+:wake EndPassive   ;
PatSg2+:sa EndPassive   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ro EndPassive   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yako EndPassive   ;
PatSg3Neuter+:yo EndPassive   ; 
PatDu21+:yonkeni EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkeni EndPassive   ; 
PatDu2+:seni EndPassive   ; 
PatDu3+:roti EndPassive   ;
PatDu3Fem+:yoti EndPassive   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkwa EndPassive   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkwa EndPassive   ;
PatPl2+:sewa EndPassive   ;
PatPl3+:roti EndPassive   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yoti EndPassive   ;

LEXICON EndPassive
VerbStem   ; 

!!------------------ RELATION OR TRANSITIVE VERBS (PURPLE PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounRelation
AgentSg1+:0 RelationPronI   ;
AgentSg2+:0 RelationPronYou   ;
AgentSg3Mal+:0 RelationPronHe   ;
AgentSg3Fem+:0 RelationPronShe   ;
AgentDu21+:0 RelationPronYouI   ;
AgentDu31+:0 RelationPronSmbI   ;
AgentDu2+:0 RelationPronYou2   ;
AgentDu3+:0 Relation2Ms   ;
AgentDu3Fem+:0 Relation2Fs   ;
AgentPl3Sg1+:0 RelationYouAllI ;
AgentPl3Sg1+:0 RelationTheyAllI ;
AgentPl2+:0 RelationYouAll ;
AgentPl3+:0 RelationTheyMs   ;
AgentPl3Fem+:0 RelationTheyFs   ;

LEXICON RelationPronI
PatSg2+:kon EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ri EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:khe EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:keni EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:khe EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:khe EndRelation   ;


LEXICON RelationPronYou
PatSg1+:take EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:etshe EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:she EndRelation   ;
PatDu31+:takeni EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:she EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:she EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationPronHe
PatSg1+:rake EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:ya EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ro EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:shako EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:shonkeni EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:shonkeni EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:etshiseni EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:shonkwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:shonkwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:etshisewa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:shako EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:shako EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationPronShe
PatSg1+:yonke EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:yesa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ronwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yontate EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Neuter+:konwa EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:yonkhi EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:ronwati EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:konwati EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationPronYouI
PatSg3Mal+:etshiteni EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yethi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationPronSmbI
PatSg2+:keni EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:shakeni EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yakhi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationPronYou2
PatSg1+:takeni EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:etshiseni EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatDu31+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yetshi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON Relation2Ms
PatSg1+:yonke EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:yesa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ronwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:shakoti EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:yonkhi EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:ronwati EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:konwati EndRelation   ;

LEXICON Relation2Fs
PatSg1+:yonke EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:yesa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ronwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yakoti EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:yonkhi EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:ronwati EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:konwati EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationYouAllI
PatSg3Mal+:etshitewa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yethi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationTheyAllI
PatSg2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:shakwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yakhi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationYouAll
PatSg1+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:etshesewa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatDu31+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yetshi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationTheyMs  
PatSg1+:yonke EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:yesa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ronwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:shakoti EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:yonkhi EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;


LEXICON RelationTheyFs  
PatSg1+:yonke EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:yesa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ronwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yakoti EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:yonkhi EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;


LEXICON EndRelation
VerbStem   ; !! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in Mohawk language are actions.
!! -----------------------VERBS ---------------------------------------

LEXICON VerbStem
<0:rootStart>   VerbRoots   ;
